Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 24. Electric Utility Integrated Resource Planning.

§ 56-597.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Affiliate” means a person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with an electric utility.

“Electric utility” means any investor-owned public utility that provides electric energy for use by retail customers.

“Integrated resource plan” or

“IRP”
means a document developed by an electric utility that provides a forecast of its load obligations and a plan to meet those obligations by supply side and demand side resources over the ensuing 15 years to promote reasonable
prices, reliable service, energy independence, and environmental responsibility.

“Retail customer” means any person that purchases retail electric energy for its own consumption at one or more metering points or non-metered points of delivery located in the Commonwealth.

History.
2008, cc. 476, 603.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 476 and 603, cl. 2 provides: “That as part of its 2009 integrated resource plan developed pursuant to this act, each electric utility shall assess governmental, nonprofit, and utility programs in its service territory to assist low income
residential customers with energy costs and shall examine, in cooperation with relevant governmental, nonprofit, and private sector stakeholders, options for making any needed changes to such programs.”

Acts 2008, cc. 476 and 603, cl. 3 provides: “That a copy of each electric utility’s integrated resource plan filed with the State Corporation Commission in 2009 pursuant to this act shall also be provided to the chairmen of the House Committee on Commerce
and Labor, the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, and the Commission on Electric Utilities Restructuring.”

Acts 2013, c. 721, provides: “§ 1. That as part of its 2013 integrated resource plan filing with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 24 (§ 56-597 et seq.) of Title 56 of the Code of Virginia, any investor-owned electric utility that uses
a declining block rate for residential customers during winter months shall address the appropriateness of such rate provision. In so doing, the utility shall address the effect of the rate provision on energy conservation, peak load,
efficient and cost effective use of the utility’s generation fleet and associated infrastructure, equity among customers within the residential class, and the affordability of home heating for residential customers.”

Law Review.

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-598.
Contents of integrated resource plans.

An IRP should:

Integrate, over the planning period, the electric utility’s forecast of demand for electric generation supply with recommended plans to meet that forecasted demand and assure adequate and sufficient reliability of service, including:

Generating electricity from generation facilities that it currently operates or intends to construct or purchase;

Purchasing electricity from affiliates and third parties;

Reducing load growth and peak demand growth through cost-effective demand reduction programs; and

Utilizing energy storage facilities to help meet forecasted demand and assure adequate and sufficient reliability of service;

Identify a portfolio of electric generation supply resources, including purchased and self-generated electric power, that:

Reflect a diversity of electric generation supply and cost-effective demand reduction contracts and services so as to reduce the risks associated with an over-reliance on any particular fuel or type of generation demand and supply resources and be consistent
with the Commonwealth’s energy policies as set forth in §

45.2-1706.1

; and

Include such additional information as the Commission requests pertaining to how the electric utility intends to meets its obligation to provide electric generation service for use by its retail customers over the planning period.

a.
Consistent with § 56-585.1, is most likely to provide the electric generation supply needed to meet the forecasted demand, net of any reductions from demand side programs, so that the utility will continue to provide reliable
service at reasonable prices over the long term; and

b.
Will consider low cost energy/capacity available from short-term or spot market transactions, consistent with a reasonable assessment of risk with respect to both price and generation supply availability over the term of
the plan;

History.
2008, cc. 476, 603; 2020, c. 1190; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 327.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-1706.1

” was substituted for “§ 67-101.1” to conform with recodification of Title 67 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190, in subdivision 1, deleted “but not limited to” in the introductory language at the end; added subdivision 1 d and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 327, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “§ 67-101.1” for “§ 67-102” in subdivision 3.

Law Review.

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-599.
Integrated resource plan required.

Each electric utility shall file an updated integrated resource plan by July 1, 2015. Thereafter, each electric utility shall file an updated integrated resource plan by May 1, in each year immediately preceding the year the utility is subject to a triennial
review filing. A copy of each integrated resource plan shall be provided to the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, and to the Chairman of the Commission
on Electric Utility Regulation. All updated integrated resource plans shall comply with the provisions of any relevant order of the Commission establishing guidelines for the format and contents of updated and revised integrated
resource plans. Each integrated resource plan shall consider options for maintaining and enhancing rate stability, energy independence, economic development including retention and expansion of energy-intensive industries, and
service reliability.

In preparing an integrated resource plan, each electric utility shall systematically evaluate and may propose:

Entering into short-term and long-term electric power purchase contracts;

Owning and operating electric power generation facilities;

Building new generation facilities;

Relying on purchases from the short term or spot markets;

Making investments in demand-side resources, including energy efficiency and demand-side management services;

Taking such other actions, as the Commission may approve, to diversify its generation supply portfolio and ensure that the electric utility is able to implement an approved plan;

The methods by which the electric utility proposes to acquire the supply and demand resources identified in its proposed integrated resource plan;

The effect of current and pending state and federal environmental regulations upon the continued operation of existing electric generation facilities or options for construction of new electric generation facilities;

The most cost effective means of complying with current and pending state and federal environmental regulations, including compliance options to minimize effects on customer rates of such regulations;

Long-term electric distribution grid planning and proposed electric distribution grid transformation projects;

Developing a long-term plan for energy efficiency measures to accomplish policy goals of reduction in customer bills, particularly for low-income, elderly, and disabled customers; reduction in emissions; and reduction in carbon intensity; and

Developing a long-term plan to integrate new energy storage facilities into existing generation and distribution assets to assist with grid transformation.

As part of preparing any integrated resource plan pursuant to this section, each utility shall conduct a facility retirement study for owned facilities located in the Commonwealth that emit carbon dioxide as a byproduct of combusting fuel and shall include
the study results in its integrated resource plan. Upon filing the integrated resource plan with the Commission, the utility shall contemporaneously disclose the study results to each planning district commission, county board
of supervisors, and city and town council where such electric generation unit is located, the Department of Energy, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Virginia Employment Commission, and the Virginia Council
on Environmental Justice. The disclosure shall include (i) the driving factors of the decision to retire and (ii) the anticipated retirement year of any electric generation unit included in the plan. Any electric generating facility
with an anticipated retirement date that meets the criteria of §

45.2-1701.1

shall comply with the public disclosure requirements therein.

The Commission shall analyze and review an integrated resource plan and, after giving notice and opportunity to be heard, the Commission shall make a determination within nine months after the date of filing as to whether such an integrated resource plan
is reasonable and is in the public interest.

History.
2008, cc. 476, 603; 2015, c. 6; 2018, c. 296; 2020, c. 1190; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41, 42.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 721, provides: “§ 1. That as part of its 2013 integrated resource plan filing with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 24 (§ 56-597 et seq.) of Title 56 of the Code of Virginia, any investor-owned electric utility that uses
a declining block rate for residential customers during winter months shall address the appropriateness of such rate provision. In so doing, the utility shall address the effect of the rate provision on energy conservation, peak load,
efficient and cost effective use of the utility’s generation fleet and associated infrastructure, equity among customers within the residential class, and the affordability of home heating for residential customers.”

Acts 2015, c. 6, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly finds that (i) competitive electric utility rates, reliable electric service, and energy independence are important public policy priorities; (ii) long-term stability of electric utility rates
is a competitive advantage for the Commonwealth’s economic development; (iii) during the transition period, existing electric power generation facilities that provide for reliable electric utility service in the Commonwealth should
remain in operation when prudent; (iv) the General Assembly should be regularly informed of utility generation resource plans in light of the challenges to existing electric power generation facilities; and (v) the enactments herein
are intended to promote balanced environmental management and rate stability, to protect the Commonwealth’s economy and its consumers of electric energy, including those energy-intensive customers who are most vulnerable and rate sensitive,
and to avoid threats to service reliability or the Commonwealth’s energy independence.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 12 provides: “That any Phase II Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall consider in its integrated resource plan next filed after July 1, 2018, either as a demand-side energy
efficiency measure or a supply-side generation alternative, whether the construction or purchase of one or more generation facilities with at least one megawatt of generating capacity, having a measurable aggregate rated capacity of
200 megawatts by 2024, that use combined heat and power or waste heat to power and are located in the Commonwealth, are in the customer interest. For purposes of this analysis, the total efficiency, including the use of thermal energy,
for eligible combined heat and power facilities must meet or exceed 65 percent (Lower Heating Value). The assumed efficiency of waste heat to power systems that do not burn any supplemental fuel and use only waste heat as a fuel source
is 100 percent. As used in this enactment, “waste heat to power” means a system that generates electricity through the recovery of a qualified waste heat resource and “qualified waste heat resource” means (i) exhaust heat or flared
gas from an industrial process that does not have, as its primary purpose, the production of electricity and (ii) a pressure drop in any gas for an industrial or commercial process.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 16 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate and report upon its economic development activities and assistance
provided to Virginia localities in the area of economic development in each utility’s respective service area. Such report shall include discussion of any existing economic rate incentives, the use thereof, and recommendations for
changes of such economic rate incentives, if any; any electrical equipment discounts for economic development purposes; any ongoing support for the development of new economic development sites, including determining the energy infrastructure
and permitting requirements in advance of an end-user locating on the site, and providing marketing assistance and promotion of validated sites; any direct assistance to localities in their economic development efforts, including responses
to requests for information and proposals for economic development prospects; and any resources and personnel devoted to such economic development efforts. The report shall include a discussion of underserved areas, particularly in
rural areas of the Commonwealth, together with suggestions for enhancing economic development assistance in such rural areas. The report shall also provide recommendations for the enhancement of economic development activities in each
utility’s respective service area, including a discussion of requirements to provide electric services to business-ready sites in advance of identifying a user for such sites. Each utility shall report to the Governor, the State Corporation
Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees on December 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”
March 10, 2021.

Effective October 1, 2021, “Department of Energy” was substituted for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” to conform to the name change by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, and “45.2-1701.1” was substituted for “45.1-394.1” to conform to the recodification
of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 6, deleted subsections A and B, which read “A. Not later than December 31, 2008, the Commission shall order each electric utility to develop an integrated resource plan. The order may establish guidelines for developing an IRP.
B. By September 1, 2009, each electric utility shall file an initial integrated resource plan with the Commission, which plan shall comply with the provisions of the order of the Commission issued pursuant to subsection A.”; redesignated
the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote subsection C, which read “Each electric utility shall file an updated integrated resource plan at least every two years thereafter, which plan shall comply with the provisions of any relevant
order of the Commission establishing guidelines for the format and contents of updated and revised integrated resource plans.”; added subdivisions B 8 and 9; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296, in subsection A, substituted “by May 1, in each year immediately preceding the year the utility is subject to a triennial review filing” for “annually by May 1”; added subdivisions B 10 and B 11; in subsection C, substituted
“within nine months after the date of filing as to whether such an integrated resource plan” for “as to whether an IRP.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190 added subdivision B 12 and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subsection C, and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

Law Review.

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Electricity, § 2.